Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.020

Pension board created—Members—Terms—Vacancies—Officers—Quorum.

(1) There is hereby created in each city and town a municipal firefighters' pension board to consist of the following five members, ex officio, the mayor, or in a city of the first class, the mayor or a designated representative who shall be an elected official of the city, who shall be chairperson of the board, the city comptroller or clerk, the chairperson of finance of the city council, or if there is no chairperson of finance, the city treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of those employed and retired firefighters who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board. The members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually for a two year term. The two firefighters elected as members shall, in turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve as an alternate in the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighters or retired members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be, a member of the board. In case of absence or inability of the chairperson to act, the board may select a chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the chairperson. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.

(2) If no eligible regularly employed or retired firefighters are willing or able to be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section, then the following individuals may be elected to the board under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Any active or retired firefighters who reside within the jurisdiction served by the board. This includes active and retired firefighters under this chapter and chapters 41.18, 41.26, and 52.26 RCW;

(b) The widow or widower of a firefighter subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

[ 2020 c 107 s 2; 2007 c 218 s 19; 2003 c 30 s 2; 1988 c 164 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 19 s 1; 1961 c 255 s 10; 1947 c 91 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-41. Prior: 1935 c 39 s 1; 1919 c 196 s 3; 1909 c 50 ss 1, 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.